Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-6,182
Traveling on a downgrade; gears; position.

The driver of a motor vehicle when traveling upon a downgrade upon any highway shall not coast with the gears of such vehicle in neutral.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 80;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 39-680;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 278.